Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-20] Effect of laws, ordinances, and
rules. (a) All laws, ordinances, and rules inconsistent with this chapter
shall be void and of no effect.

(b) Any county may adopt ordinances and rules
governing any matter relating to hazardous waste management which is not
governed by a rule of the department adopted pursuant to this chapter; provided
that any county ordinance or rule relating to hazardous waste management shall
be void and of no effect as to any matter regulated by a rule of the department
upon the adoption thereof. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next